ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 481 Y 18
SFX 481 0 a .
SFX 481 0 ach .
SFX 481 0 am .
SFX 481 0 ami .
SFX 481 0 i .
SFX 481 0 im .
SFX 481 0 imej .
SFX 481 0 imy .
SFX 481 0 itej .
SFX 481 0 iśo .
SFX 481 0 iš .
SFX 481 0 o .
SFX 481 0 oju .
SFX 481 0 om .
SFX 481 0 oma .
SFX 481 0 ow .
SFX 481 0 owu .
SFX 481 0 u .
SFX 482 Y 19
SFX 482 0 a .
SFX 482 0 ach .
SFX 482 0 am .
SFX 482 0 ami .
SFX 482 0 i .
SFX 482 0 im .
SFX 482 0 imej .
SFX 482 0 imy .
SFX 482 0 itej .
SFX 482 0 iśo .
SFX 482 0 iš .
SFX 482 0 o .
SFX 482 0 oju .
SFX 482 0 om .
SFX 482 0 oma .
SFX 482 0 ow .
SFX 482 0 owu .
SFX 482 0 u .
SFX 482 0 y .
SFX 483 Y 19
SFX 483 0 a .
SFX 483 0 ach .
SFX 483 0 am .
SFX 483 0 ami .
SFX 483 0 i .
SFX 483 0 im .
SFX 483 0 imej .
SFX 483 0 imy .
SFX 483 0 itej .
SFX 483 0 iśo .
SFX 483 0 iš .
SFX 483 0 o .
SFX 483 0 oju .
SFX 483 0 om .
SFX 483 0 oma .
SFX 483 0 ow .
SFX 483 0 owu .
SFX 483 0 u .
SFX 483 0 y .
SFX 484 Y 16
SFX 484 0 a .
SFX 484 0 e .
SFX 484 0 ego .
SFX 484 0 ej .
SFX 484 0 eje .
SFX 484 0 eju .
SFX 484 0 em .
SFX 484 0 emu .
SFX 484 0 i .
SFX 484 0 ich .
SFX 484 0 im .
SFX 484 0 ima .
SFX 484 0 imi .
SFX 484 0 oma .
SFX 484 0 owu .
SFX 484 0 u .
SFX 485 Y 34
SFX 485 0 a .
SFX 485 0 ach .
SFX 485 0 am .
SFX 485 0 ami .
SFX 485 0 e .
SFX 485 0 ego .
SFX 485 0 ej .
SFX 485 0 eje .
SFX 485 0 eju .
SFX 485 0 em .
SFX 485 0 emu .
SFX 485 0 ijo .
SFX 485 0 ijom .
SFX 485 0 ijomej .
SFX 485 0 ijomy .
SFX 485 0 ijotej .
SFX 485 0 ijośo .
SFX 485 0 ijoš .
SFX 485 0 iju .
SFX 485 0 mej .
SFX 485 0 my .
SFX 485 0 oju .
SFX 485 0 om .
SFX 485 0 oma .
SFX 485 0 ow .
SFX 485 0 owu .
SFX 485 0 tej .
SFX 485 0 u .
SFX 485 0 y .
SFX 485 0 ych .
SFX 485 0 ym .
SFX 485 0 yma .
SFX 485 0 ymi .
SFX 485 0 śo .
SFX 486 Y 17
SFX 486 0 a .
SFX 486 0 ach .
SFX 486 0 am .
SFX 486 0 ami .
SFX 486 0 i .
SFX 486 0 im .
SFX 486 0 imej .
SFX 486 0 imy .
SFX 486 0 itej .
SFX 486 0 iśo .
SFX 486 0 iš .
SFX 486 0 oma .
SFX 486 0 ow .
SFX 486 0 owu .
SFX 486 0 u .
SFX 486 0 y .
SFX 486 0 ymi .
SFX 487 Y 33
SFX 487 0 ach .
SFX 487 0 achmej .
SFX 487 0 achmy .
SFX 487 0 achu .
SFX 487 0 ašo .
SFX 487 0 aštej .
SFX 487 0 ašćo .
SFX 487 0 e .
SFX 487 0 ech .
SFX 487 0 echmej .
SFX 487 0 echmy .
SFX 487 0 echu .
SFX 487 0 eštej .
SFX 487 0 ešćo .
SFX 487 0 mej .
SFX 487 0 my .
SFX 487 0 o .
SFX 487 0 om .
SFX 487 0 omej .
SFX 487 0 omy .
SFX 487 0 otej .
SFX 487 0 ośo .
SFX 487 0 oš .
SFX 487 0 tej .
SFX 487 0 yjo .
SFX 487 0 yjom .
SFX 487 0 yjomej .
SFX 487 0 yjomy .
SFX 487 0 yjotej .
SFX 487 0 yjośo .
SFX 487 0 yjoš .
SFX 487 0 yju .
SFX 487 0 ćo .
SFX 488 Y 9
SFX 488 0 og .
SFX 488 0 ogo .
SFX 488 0 ogožkuli .
SFX 488 0 om .
SFX 488 0 omu .
SFX 488 0 omužkuli .
SFX 488 0 omžkuli .
SFX 488 0 ym .
SFX 488 0 ymžkuli .
SFX 489 Y 18
SFX 489 0 a .
SFX 489 0 ach .
SFX 489 0 am .
SFX 489 0 ami .
SFX 489 0 e .
SFX 489 0 ego .
SFX 489 0 ej .
SFX 489 0 eje .
SFX 489 0 eju .
SFX 489 0 em .
SFX 489 0 emu .
SFX 489 0 ow .
SFX 489 0 u .
SFX 489 0 y .
SFX 489 0 ych .
SFX 489 0 ym .
SFX 489 0 yma .
SFX 489 0 ymi .
SFX 490 Y 14
SFX 490 0 ach .
SFX 490 0 achmej .
SFX 490 0 achmy .
SFX 490 0 achu .
SFX 490 0 ašo .
SFX 490 0 aštej .
SFX 490 0 ašćo .
SFX 490 0 e .
SFX 490 0 m .
SFX 490 0 mej .
SFX 490 0 my .
SFX 490 0 tej .
SFX 490 0 śo .
SFX 490 0 š .
SFX 491 Y 20
SFX 491 0 a .
SFX 491 0 ach .
SFX 491 0 am .
SFX 491 0 ami .
SFX 491 0 i .
SFX 491 0 ijo .
SFX 491 0 ijom .
SFX 491 0 ijomej .
SFX 491 0 ijomy .
SFX 491 0 ijotej .
SFX 491 0 ijośo .
SFX 491 0 ijoš .
SFX 491 0 iju .
SFX 491 0 oju .
SFX 491 0 om .
SFX 491 0 oma .
SFX 491 0 ow .
SFX 491 0 owu .
SFX 491 0 u .
SFX 491 0 y .
SFX 492 Y 19
SFX 492 0 a .
SFX 492 0 ach .
SFX 492 0 am .
SFX 492 0 ami .
SFX 492 0 ijo .
SFX 492 0 ijom .
SFX 492 0 ijomej .
SFX 492 0 ijomy .
SFX 492 0 ijotej .
SFX 492 0 ijośo .
SFX 492 0 ijoš .
SFX 492 0 iju .
SFX 492 0 oju .
SFX 492 0 om .
SFX 492 0 oma .
SFX 492 0 ow .
SFX 492 0 owu .
SFX 492 0 u .
SFX 492 0 y .
SFX 493 Y 19
SFX 493 0 a .
SFX 493 0 ach .
SFX 493 0 am .
SFX 493 0 ami .
SFX 493 0 ijo .
SFX 493 0 ijom .
SFX 493 0 ijomej .
SFX 493 0 ijomy .
SFX 493 0 ijotej .
SFX 493 0 ijośo .
SFX 493 0 ijoš .
SFX 493 0 iju .
SFX 493 0 o .
SFX 493 0 oju .
SFX 493 0 om .
SFX 493 0 oma .
SFX 493 0 ow .
SFX 493 0 owu .
SFX 493 0 u .
SFX 494 Y 12
SFX 494 0 ach .
SFX 494 0 achmej .
SFX 494 0 achmy .
SFX 494 0 achu .
SFX 494 0 ašo .
SFX 494 0 aštej .
SFX 494 0 ašćo .
SFX 494 0 e .
SFX 494 0 mej .
SFX 494 0 my .
SFX 494 0 tej .
SFX 494 0 ćo .
SFX 495 Y 13
SFX 495 0 ach .
SFX 495 0 am .
SFX 495 0 ami .
SFX 495 0 e .
SFX 495 0 o .
SFX 495 0 om .
SFX 495 0 omej .
SFX 495 0 omy .
SFX 495 0 otej .
SFX 495 0 ow .
SFX 495 0 ośo .
SFX 495 0 oš .
SFX 495 0 u .
SFX 496 Y 14
SFX 496 0 ach .
SFX 496 0 am .
SFX 496 0 ami .
SFX 496 0 e .
SFX 496 0 i .
SFX 496 0 o .
SFX 496 0 om .
SFX 496 0 omej .
SFX 496 0 omy .
SFX 496 0 otej .
SFX 496 0 ow .
SFX 496 0 ośo .
SFX 496 0 oš .
SFX 496 0 u .
SFX 497 Y 17
SFX 497 0 a .
SFX 497 0 e .
SFX 497 0 ego .
SFX 497 0 ej .
SFX 497 0 eje .
SFX 497 0 eju .
SFX 497 0 em .
SFX 497 0 emu .
SFX 497 0 ich .
SFX 497 0 im .
SFX 497 0 imi .
SFX 497 0 u .
SFX 497 0 y .
SFX 497 0 ych .
SFX 497 0 ym .
SFX 497 0 yma .
SFX 497 0 ymi .
SFX 498 Y 14
SFX 498 0 ach .
SFX 498 0 achmej .
SFX 498 0 achmy .
SFX 498 0 achu .
SFX 498 0 am .
SFX 498 0 ami .
SFX 498 0 ašo .
SFX 498 0 aštej .
SFX 498 0 ašćo .
SFX 498 0 e .
SFX 498 0 oma .
SFX 498 0 ow .
SFX 498 0 owu .
SFX 498 0 u .
SFX 499 Y 15
SFX 499 0 a .
SFX 499 0 ach .
SFX 499 0 achmej .
SFX 499 0 achmy .
SFX 499 0 achu .
SFX 499 0 am .
SFX 499 0 ami .
SFX 499 0 ašo .
SFX 499 0 aštej .
SFX 499 0 ašćo .
SFX 499 0 e .
SFX 499 0 oma .
SFX 499 0 ow .
SFX 499 0 owu .
SFX 499 0 u .
SFX 500 Y 18
SFX 500 0 a .
SFX 500 0 e .
SFX 500 0 ego .
SFX 500 0 ej .
SFX 500 0 eje .
SFX 500 0 eju .
SFX 500 0 em .
SFX 500 0 emu .
SFX 500 0 o .
SFX 500 0 ogo .
SFX 500 0 om .
SFX 500 0 omu .
SFX 500 0 u .
SFX 500 0 y .
SFX 500 0 ych .
SFX 500 0 ym .
SFX 500 0 yma .
SFX 500 0 ymi .
SFX 501 Y 19
SFX 501 0 a .
SFX 501 0 e .
SFX 501 0 ego .
SFX 501 0 ej .
SFX 501 0 eje .
SFX 501 0 eju .
SFX 501 0 em .
SFX 501 0 emu .
SFX 501 0 i .
SFX 501 0 o .
SFX 501 0 ogo .
SFX 501 0 om .
SFX 501 0 omu .
SFX 501 0 u .
SFX 501 0 y .
SFX 501 0 ych .
SFX 501 0 ym .
SFX 501 0 yma .
SFX 501 0 ymi .
SFX 502 Y 19
SFX 502 0 a .
SFX 502 0 e .
SFX 502 0 ego .
SFX 502 0 ej .
SFX 502 0 eje .
SFX 502 0 eju .
SFX 502 0 em .
SFX 502 0 emu .
SFX 502 0 i .
SFX 502 0 og .
SFX 502 0 ogo .
SFX 502 0 om .
SFX 502 0 omu .
SFX 502 0 u .
SFX 502 0 y .
SFX 502 0 ych .
SFX 502 0 ym .
SFX 502 0 yma .
SFX 502 0 ymi .
SFX 503 Y 27
SFX 503 0 ach .
SFX 503 0 achmej .
SFX 503 0 achmy .
SFX 503 0 achu .
SFX 503 0 ašo .
SFX 503 0 aštej .
SFX 503 0 ašćo .
SFX 503 0 e .
SFX 503 0 mej .
SFX 503 0 my .
SFX 503 0 o .
SFX 503 0 om .
SFX 503 0 omej .
SFX 503 0 omy .
SFX 503 0 otej .
SFX 503 0 ośo .
SFX 503 0 oš .
SFX 503 0 tej .
SFX 503 0 u .
SFX 503 0 y .
SFX 503 0 ym .
SFX 503 0 ymej .
SFX 503 0 ymy .
SFX 503 0 ytej .
SFX 503 0 yśo .
SFX 503 0 yš .
SFX 503 0 ćo .
SFX 504 Y 13
SFX 504 0 ch .
SFX 504 0 chmej .
SFX 504 0 chmy .
SFX 504 0 chu .
SFX 504 0 e .
SFX 504 0 m .
SFX 504 0 mej .
SFX 504 0 my .
SFX 504 0 tej .
SFX 504 0 śo .
SFX 504 0 š .
SFX 504 0 štej .
SFX 504 0 šćo .
SFX 505 Y 12
SFX 505 0 mej .
SFX 505 0 my .
SFX 505 0 o .
SFX 505 0 om .
SFX 505 0 omej .
SFX 505 0 omy .
SFX 505 0 otej .
SFX 505 0 ośo .
SFX 505 0 oš .
SFX 505 0 tej .
SFX 505 0 u .
SFX 505 0 ćo .
SFX 506 Y 13
SFX 506 0 e .
SFX 506 0 mej .
SFX 506 0 my .
SFX 506 0 o .
SFX 506 0 om .
SFX 506 0 omej .
SFX 506 0 omy .
SFX 506 0 otej .
SFX 506 0 ośo .
SFX 506 0 oš .
SFX 506 0 tej .
SFX 506 0 u .
SFX 506 0 ćo .
SFX 507 Y 12
SFX 507 0 mej .
SFX 507 0 my .
SFX 507 0 o .
SFX 507 0 om .
SFX 507 0 omej .
SFX 507 0 omy .
SFX 507 0 otej .
SFX 507 0 ośo .
SFX 507 0 oš .
SFX 507 0 tej .
SFX 507 0 u .
SFX 507 0 śo .
