ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
bagn/481
basnj/1,498
blandr/1,482
blar/483
boboc/505
brjeńc/506
broj/490
bronj/1,498
bruc/503
brunj/1,498
buchoc/505
cakoc/505
cerj/1,498
ceš/506
chrapj/1,495
chychoc/505
dat/489
dejkoc/505
der/492
dognoj/504
dogron/493
doj/490
dopiš/505
dopósćel/507
dowugoj/504
dowugój/504
dozakłoj/504
dreboc/505
giž/505
glědkoc/505
gown/481
grabj/1,495
gryzkoc/505
góleś/1,484
jadn/1,500
kapoc/506
kawkoc/505
kjachoc/505
klekoc/505
knakoc/505
kunkoc/505
kur/1,486
kurjeś/1,484
kólen/481
kólnj/1,499
kłoj/490
kśikoc/505
lětkoc/505
manj/1,498
mlackoc/505
murj/1,499
nabroj/504
naceš/505
nadoj/504
nagnoj/504
nagron/493
nakiš/505
nakłoj/504
napiš/505
naproj/504
nasćel/507
nazběrkoc/505
nazgón/492
naznoj/504
nałoj/504
njebaj/507
njeblaboc/505
njebrinkoc/505
njebroj/490
njebruc/503
njebulkoc/505
njeceš/505
njecyboc/505
njederkoc/505
njedodoj/504
njedognoj/504
njedoj/490
njedopokaž/505
njedopósćel/507
njedowugoj/504
njedowugój/504
njedozakłoj/504
njedryboc/505
njedwój/490
njegjagoc/505
njegnoj/490
njegnyboc/505
njegryž/505
njekawkoc/505
njekjachoc/505
njeklekoc/505
njeknakoc/505
njekunkoc/505
njekłoj/490
njekśikoc/505
njelětkoc/505
njemlackoc/505
njemroj/490
njenabroj/504
njenaceš/505
njenadoj/504
njenagnoj/504
njenakiš/505
njenakłoj/504
njenapiš/505
njenapoj/504
njenaproj/504
njenasćel/507
njenatšoj/504
njenazběrkoc/505
njenaznoj/504
njenałoj/504
njeniž/503
njepałc/505
njepjerškoc/505
njepokaž/505
njeproj/490
njepóceš/505
njepódoj/504
njepódwój/504
njepógnoj/504
njepókiš/505
njepónamaž/505
njepósćel/507
njepósłopoc/505
njepótšoj/504
njepóznoj/504
njepółoj/504
njepóšnapoc/505
njepśebroj/504
njepśegluskoc/505
njepśegnoj/504
njepśekłoj/504
njepśeliž/505
njepśeproj/504
njepśepósćel/507
njepśepłac/505
njepśeswój/504
njepśeznoj/504
njepśełoj/504
njepśimikoc/505
njepśipósćel/507
njepśismjejkoc/505
njepśiswój/504
njepśitšoj/504
njepśiłoj/504
njeroj/490
njerozbroj/504
njerozdwój/504
njerozesćel/507
njerozkaš/505
njerozkłoj/504
njerozproj/504
njerozpósćel/507
njerězkoc/505
njeskłoj/504
njesmjejkoc/505
njespokoj/504
njesproj/504
njesykoc/505
njetrješ/494
njetykoc/505
njetšoj/490
njetšurkoc/505
njewjedr/481
njewobgnoj/504
njewobmaž/505
njewopiš/505
njewopoj/504
njewudoj/504
njewugnoj/504
njewugój/504
njewukiš/505
njewukłoj/504
njewupoj/504
njewuproj/504
njewupósćel/507
njewuroj/504
njewusmjejkoc/505
njewuspokoj/504
njewuswój/504
njewusćel/507
njewuznoj/504
njewułoj/504
njewótkapoc/505
njewótkłoj/504
njewótproj/504
njewótpósćel/507
njewótznoj/504
njewótłoj/504
njewótšnekoc/505
njezabroj/504
njezagluskoc/505
njezagnoj/504
njezagój/504
njezakokoc/505
njezakłoj/504
njezamóž/487
njezapoj/504
njezapraskoc/505
njezapósćel/507
njezasćel/507
njezatšoj/504
njezaznoj/504
njezašepoc/505
njezbroj/504
njezdwój/504
njezesćel/507
njezeškraboc/505
njeznoj/490
njezroj/504
njezwěž/505
njezłoj/504
njełoj/490
nješkripoc/505
nješyboc/505
něc/1,488
pałc/506
pikoc/505
pjelsnj/1,498
pomyj/1,496
praskoc/505
proj/490
proznj/1,498
pódoj/504
pódwój/504
pógnoj/504
pókjawkoc/505
pólodnj/1,499
póstrow/485
pósćel/507
pótšoj/504
pówarkoc/505
póznoj/504
półoj/504
pěsnj/1,499
pśebroj/504
pśedgron/493
pśedpałc/506
pśegnoj/504
pśegron/493
pśekjawkoc/505
pśekłoj/504
pśeměr/492
pśeproj/504
pśepósćel/507
pśeskaž/505
pśeswój/504
pśeznoj/504
pśigron/493
pśiměr/492
pśinadwěž/505
pśipósćel/507
pśiscyn/492
pśiswój/504
pśizmyrkoc/505
pśiłoj/504
rozdwój/504
rozesćel/507
rozgron/493
rozliž/505
rozměr/492
rozpósćel/507
sam/501
sedym/497
serkoc/505
skłoj/504
spiwkoc/505
swinj/1,499
swědr/481
słapoc/505
tonj/1,498
trješ/494
twarj/1,498
tłuskoc/505
watśkoc/505
wjedr/481
wobgnoj/504
wobgron/493
wobpśimkoc/505
wokłon/492
wopałc/506
wuceš/505
wudoj/504
wugój/504
wugón/492
wuliž/505
wupoj/504
wupósćel/507
wuroj/504
wuswój/504
wusćel/507
wutwar/491
wutwór/492
wutšurkoc/505
wułoj/504
wón/502
wósym/497
wótegron/493
wótgron/493
wótknyc/505
wótkłon/491
wótměr/492
wótproj/504
wótpósćel/507
wótpłun/492
wótwór/492
wótłoj/504
zaborkoc/505
zader/492
zagnoj/504
zagron/493
zakaškoc/505
zakyrkoc/505
zakłoj/504
zamóž/487
zaměr/492
zapałc/506
zapósćel/507
zarěž/505
zasćel/507
zatšoj/504
zblaboc/505
zbroj/504
zelenj/1,498
zesćel/507
zgryž/505
zroj/504
łykoc/505
šerj/1,498
škrj/1,499
šnepoc/505
šyrj/1,498
źěłkoc/505
žedn/1,500
